Maryland, session 2025, SB1006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–228.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “STATE PUBLIC ART” MEANS PUBLIC ART
COMMISSIONED FOR A PROJECT THAT RECEIVES STATE FUNDING, REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER THE STATE FUNDING DIRECTLY PAID FOR THE PUBLIC ART.
(B) AN ENTITY MAY NOT INCLUDE IN A CONTRACT FOR STATE PUBLIC ART
A REQUIREMENT THAT AN ARTIST WAIVE COPYRIGHT PROTECTIONS OR RIGHTS
UNDER 17 U.S.C. § 106A.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb1006*

SENATE BILL 1006
(C) A COURT MAY NOT ENFORCE A WAIVER DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION THAT IS INCLUDED IN A CONTRACT ENTERED INTO BEFORE
OCTOBER 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.